Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6157.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "shielding information for lawful and ethical disclosure act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Disclose personal information in bulk" or "disclosure of personal information in bulk" means the transferring or sharing of personal information that relates to multiple individuals without individualized review of the personal information or specific legal authorization. (b) "Federal immigration authority" means a federal immigration officer. (c) "Government entity" means any state, county, or municipal department, bureau, division, section, board, commission, trustee, authority, or officer, created by the state constitution of 1963, statute, or agency action. (d) "Personal information" means information that identifies, relates to, describes, or could reasonably be linked to an individual, including, but not limited to, the individual's name, address, contact information, or identification numbers, or other data elements that can be used to identify a specific individual. Sec. 5. A government entity shall not disclose personal information in bulk to a federal immigration authority unless 1 of the following conditions is met: (a) The federal immigration authority presents a warrant, subpoena, or court order, issued by a court of competent jurisdiction, for the disclosure of personal information in bulk. (b) The disclosure of personal information in bulk is for a law enforcement purpose authorized by law. (c) The disclosure of personal information in bulk is immediately necessary to secure the health and safety of an individual or the general public. Sec. 7. (1) The attorney general may bring an action for injunctive relief or a declaratory judgment to enforce this act. (2) This act does not create a private cause of action against a government entity.